Vermont, session 2025-2026, H189.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Fatal and nonfatal drug overdoses in Vermont are an urgent public
health crisis, with rates of overdose deaths rising sharply in recent years. Drug
overdose reportedly killed 264 Vermonters in 2022 and drug toxicity deaths
have increased by over 500 percent since 2010.
(2) Nonfatal opioid overdose emergency department visits have also
been increasing. From 2018 to 2021, 1,631 individuals visited an emergency
department for an opioid overdose.
(3) Research has consistently shown that public health strategies are
effective at reducing overdose deaths, reducing the transmission of infectious
diseases, and improving health outcomes for individuals who use drugs.
(4) Investments in criminal justice approaches have proven ineffective
in reducing overdose. Despite more than 10,000 arrests for drug possession
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 3 of 40
offenses since 2010, fatal drug overdoses have continued to rise during this
period.
(5) The medical and public understanding that addiction is a chronic
brain disease has increased in recent years, yet Vermont’s laws have continued
to reflect a punitive criminal justice model that has been ineffective in
improving public health and has itself caused extensive harm.
(6) The criminalization of drug use has profoundly negative impacts on
individuals, families, and communities. The stigma of a criminal arrest or
conviction often results in detrimental physical, psychological, and economic
impacts on the lives of those arrested. Involvement in the criminal legal
system can interfere with employment, housing, educational opportunities, and
professional licensing and lead to burdensome debt from fines. According to a
2020 report by the Brennan Center for Justice, individuals convicted of a
misdemeanor have their annual earnings reduced by an average of 16 percent.
(7) Studies have also repeatedly found that periods of incarceration
substantially increase the risk of fatal overdose. Within the first two weeks of
release from incarceration, an individual is substantially more likely to die
from a fatal overdose than a person who was not detained.
(8) Criminalizing drug use and possession reduces the amount of
resources available for harm reduction and treatment services, deters
individuals from accessing available services due to fear of arrest, and
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 4 of 40
compounds the social barriers and traumas often contributing to substance use
disorder. Arrests and prosecutions can further traumatize individuals who
were previously experiencing pain or suffering from prior traumatic events or
circumstances.
(9) Enforcement of the drug laws in Vermont, as well as nationally, falls
disproportionately on persons of color despite similar rates in usage and sale of
drugs. Prior to Vermont’s legalization of cannabis in 2018, Black persons
were six times more likely to be arrested for cannabis possession than White
persons. A 2021 study conducted by the Council of State Governments found
that between 2014 and 2019, Black persons in Vermont were 14 times more
likely than White persons to be defendants in a felony drug case and
18 percentage points more likely than White persons to be sentenced to
incarceration for a felony drug offense.
(10) A health-based approach to drugs, prioritizing the expansion of
harm reduction services and on-demand access to evidence-based treatment,
rather than the traditional criminal justice model, has proven to be more
effective at preventing opioid deaths and drug-related injuries, reducing the
spread of HIV and Hepatitis C and improving health outcomes for persons who
use drugs. In particular, harm reduction interventions such as drug-checking
services and overdose prevention centers have been implemented throughout
the world with demonstrated success in saving lives, providing greater stability
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 5 of 40
and facilitating access to health care and services for participants, while also
significantly benefitting surrounding communities.
(11) Harm reduction services, including overdose prevention centers and
drug-checking programs, have been shown to be highly effective in reducing
the risk that a drug overdose will become fatal and in improving health
outcomes for participants.
(12) Throughout the last decade in Vermont, the approach to drugs has
gradually shifted toward policies focused on prevention, treatment, and harm
reduction rather than punishment. In recent years, the General Assembly has
enacted legislation decriminalizing possession of the opiate disorder treatment
drug buprenorphine, granting immunity from prosecution for possession of
drugs for a person who seeks assistance for themselves or another who is
experiencing an overdose, supporting the establishment of drug-checking
services, authorizing and appropriating funds for overdose prevention centers,
providing widespread access to naloxone to treat opiate overdoses in an
emergency, and supporting other harm reduction interventions such as syringe
service programs.
(13) Eliminating criminal penalties for possessing personal use amounts
of regulated drugs would continue this progress in shifting toward a fully
public-health approach to drug use and addiction by helping eliminate barriers
for those who need supportive services. The elimination of criminal penalties
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 6 of 40
removes the fear of arrest, which drives many individuals to hide their
substance use, consume drugs alone in dangerous circumstances, and avoid
seeking help from health care systems and harm reduction providers. Such a
strategic shift will also allow Vermont to redirect money and resources from
prosecution and incarceration toward prevention, harm reduction strategies,
and addiction services, affording better outcomes for all Vermonters.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4201 is amended to read:
§ 4201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Depressant or stimulant drug” means:
(A) any drug that contains any quantity of barbituric acid or any of
the salts of barbituric acid, or any derivative of barbituric acid, that is
designated as habit-forming because of its effect on the central nervous system
in the rules adopted by the Department of Health under section 4202 of this
title;
(B) any drug, other than methamphetamine, that contains any
quantity of amphetamine or any of its optical isomers, any salt or amphetamine
or any salt of an optical isomer of amphetamine, that the Department of Health
so designates by such rule as habit-forming because of its effect on the central
nervous system;
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 7 of 40
(C) gamma hydroxybutyric acid, including its salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers;
(D) gamma butyrolactone, including 4-butyrolactone and gamma
hydroxybutyric acid lactone, including its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers,
when packaged, marketed, manufactured, or intended for human consumption;
(E) ketamine, including its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(F) flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; and
(G) any drug, other than methamphetamine, that contains any
quantity of a substance that the Department of Health so designates by such
rule as having a serious potential for abuse arising out of its effect on the
central nervous system.
(7) “Dispense” includes distribute, leave with, give away, dispose of, or
deliver.
* * *
(10) “Hallucinogenic drugs” means stramonium, mescaline or peyote,
lysergic acid diethylamide, and psilocybin, and all synthetic equivalents of
chemicals contained in resinous extractives of Cannabis sativa, or any salts or
derivatives or compounds of any preparations or mixtures thereof, and any
other substance that is designated as habit-forming or as having a serious
potential for abuse arising out of its effect on the central nervous system or its
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 8 of 40
hallucinogenic effect in the rules adopted by the Department of Health under
section 4202 of this title.
* * *
(16) “Narcotic,” “narcotics,” or “narcotic drugs” means opium, coca
leaves, pethidine (isonipecaine, meperidine), and opiates or their compound,
manufacture, salt, alkaloid, or derivative, and every substance neither
chemically nor physically distinguishable from them, and preparations
containing such drugs or their derivatives, by whatever trade name identified
and whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis or by a
combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, as the same are so
designated in the rules adopted by the Department of Health under section
4202 of this title.
* * *
(29) “Regulated drug” means:
(A) a narcotic drug;
(B) a depressant or stimulant drug, other than methamphetamine;
(C) a hallucinogenic drug;
(D) Ecstasy;
(E) cannabis;
(F) methamphetamine; or
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 9 of 40
(G) xylazine.
(30) “Sale” means transfer for a consideration or barter or exchange or
an offer or express or implied promise to transfer for a consideration or barter
or exchange, and each such transaction made by any person, whether as
principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee.
* * *
(34) “Deliver” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer or
prescription of a regulated drug, whether or not there exists an agency
relationship.
* * *
(46) “Benchmark unlawful dosage” means the maximum recommended
therapeutic dose, or maximum daily dose, as determined by the Department by
rule.
* * *
(50) “Benchmark personal use supply” means the quantity of a drug
commonly possessed for consumption by an individual for any therapeutic,
medicinal, or recreational purpose.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4202 is amended to read:
§ 4202. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
(a) The Department of Health is authorized and empowered to adopt such
rules that in its judgment may be necessary or proper to supplement the
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 10 of 40
provisions of this chapter to effectuate the purposes and intent thereof or to
clarify its provisions so as to provide the procedure or details to secure
effective and proper enforcement of its provisions.
(b) These rules and determinations, when adopted, shall, until modified or
rescinded, have the force and effect of law.
* * *
(e) The Department shall adopt rules reflecting the benchmarks
recommended by the Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory Board in
accordance with section 4202a of this title.
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 4202a is added to read:
§ 4202a. DRUG USE HEALTH AND SAFETY ADVISORY BOARD
(a) There is hereby created the Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory
Board composed of experts in the fields of general and behavioral health care,
substance use disorder treatment, harm reduction services, and drug user
communities.
(b) The primary objectives of the Advisory Board shall be:
(1) To determine the benchmark personal use supply for each regulated
drug. The benchmarks determined pursuant to this subsection shall be
determined with a goal of preventing and reducing the criminalization of
personal drug possession and use.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 11 of 40
(2) To distribute and provide oversight of grant funding from the
Community Care, Health, and Safety Special Fund.
(c) The Advisory Board shall be composed of the following 13 members:
(1) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices; two representatives from harm reduction service
providers; one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder; and one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction,
and drug policy, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(2) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices; two representatives from harm reduction service
providers; one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder; and one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction,
and drug policy, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(3) an expert on legal reform appointed by the Center for Justice Reform
at Vermont Law and Graduate School.
(d) Upon convening, the members of the Advisory Board shall elect a chair
by majority vote and shall fill any vacancy of the Chair by the same. A
majority of members shall constitute a quorum.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 12 of 40
(e) On or before January 1, 2026, the Advisory Board shall provide the
recommended quantities for benchmark personal use supply for each category
of regulated drug listed in subdivision 4201(29) of this title.
(f) The Advisory Board shall convene at least one time per year to review
benchmarks established pursuant to this section and recommend any necessary
amendments. The Chair of the Advisory Board may, with the consent of a
majority of members, convene additional meetings to receive testimony from
experts on drug use, substance use disorder, and medical research or practice
relating to any specific drug.
(g) The Department shall initiate rulemaking to adopt benchmark personal
use supplies not later than 90 days following the receipt of recommendations
from the Advisory Board. The Department shall give full consideration to the
recommendations of the Advisory Board and provide detailed explanations for
any deviations from the recommendations of the Advisory Board in the
proposed rules.
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 4231 is amended to read:
§ 4231. COCAINE
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine shall
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 13 of 40
be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or
both.
(B) A person knowingly possessing cocaine in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of one ounce or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(4) [Repealed.]
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing cocaine shall
be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 14 of 40
(B) A person knowingly dispensing cocaine in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling cocaine shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing cocaine in
an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing cocaine in
an amount consisting of one ounce or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 4232 is amended to read:
§ 4232. LSD
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 15 of 40
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more
than $2,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly possessing lysergic acid diethylamide in an
amount equal to or less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be
subject to a criminal or civil penalty but shall be provided health needs
screening information pursuant to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 100 milligrams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not
more than $25,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more
than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 10 grams or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more
than $500,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 16 of 40
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more
than $25,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing lysergic acid diethylamide in an
amount equal to or less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be
subject to a criminal or civil penalty but shall be provided health needs
screening information pursuant to section 4240b of this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more
than $25,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing lysergic
acid diethylamide in an amount consisting of 100 milligrams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not
more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing lysergic
acid diethylamide in an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 17 of 40
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more
than $500,000.00, or both.
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4233 is amended to read:
§ 4233. HEROIN
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly possessing heroin in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of 200 milligrams or more of one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not more than
five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of one gram or more of one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not more than
10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 18 of 40
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not more than
20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing heroin in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing heroin in
an amount consisting of 200 milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 19 of 40
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing heroin in
an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 4233a is amended to read:
§ 4233a. FENTANYL
(a) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing fentanyl shall
be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing fentanyl in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing fentanyl in
an amount consisting of four milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 20 of 40
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing fentanyl in
an amount consisting of 20 milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(4) In lieu of a charge under this subsection, but in addition to any other
penalties provided by law, a person knowingly and unlawfully selling or
dispensing any regulated drug containing a detectable amount of fentanyl shall
be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or
both.
* * *
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 4233b is amended to read:
§ 4233b. XYLAZINE
* * *
(c)(1) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing xylazine shall be imprisoned
not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or both. A
person knowingly and unlawfully selling xylazine shall be imprisoned not
more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly dispensing xylazine in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 21 of 40
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
* * *
Sec. 10. 18 V.S.A. § 4234 is amended to read:
§ 4234. DEPRESSANT, STIMULANT, AND NARCOTIC DRUGS
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) Except as provided by subdivision subdivisions (B) and (C) of
this subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a
depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, shall be
imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 224 milligrams
or less of buprenorphine shall not be punished in accordance with subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (1).
(C) A person knowingly possessing a depressant, stimulant, or
narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, in an amount equal to or less than a
benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or civil
penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant to
section 4240b of this title. For buprenorphine, this subdivision (1)(C) shall
apply to an amount of more than 224 milligrams but equal to or less than a
benchmark personal use supply.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 22 of 40
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 100
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 1,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 10,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine, shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing a depressant, stimulant, or
narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine, in an amount less than a
benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or civil
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 23 of 40
penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant to
section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling a depressant, stimulant,
or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, cocaine, or heroin, shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(2)(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing a
depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine,
consisting of 100 times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent, shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(3)(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing a
depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine,
consisting of 1,000 times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall
be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or
both.
(4)(5) As used in this subsection, “knowingly” means:
(A) the defendant had actual knowledge that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter; or
(B) the defendant:
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 24 of 40
(i) was aware that there is a high probability that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter; and
(ii) took deliberate actions to avoid learning that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter.
(c) Possession of buprenorphine by a person under 21 years of age.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a person
under 21 years of age who knowingly and unlawfully possesses 224
milligrams or less of buprenorphine commits a civil violation and shall be
subject to the provisions of section 4230b of this title.
(2) A person under 16 years of age who knowingly and unlawfully
possesses 224 milligrams or less of buprenorphine commits a delinquent act
and shall be subject to the provisions of section 4230j of this title.
Sec. 11. 18 V.S.A. § 4234a is amended to read:
§ 4234a. METHAMPHETAMINE
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not
more than $2,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 25 of 40
(B) A person knowingly possessing methamphetamine in an amount
equal to or less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a
criminal or civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening
information pursuant to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 25 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or
both.
(b) Selling and dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not
more than $75,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing methamphetamine in an amount
equal to or less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 26 of 40
criminal or civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening
information pursuant to section 4240b of this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling methamphetamine
shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than
$100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing
methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not
more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing
methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 25 grams or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not
more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 12. 18 V.S.A. § 4234b is amended to read:
§ 4234b. EPHEDRINE AND PSEUDOEPHEDRINE
(a) Possession.
(1) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully possess a drug product
containing ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 27 of 40
base with the intent to use the product as a precursor to manufacture
methamphetamine or another controlled substance.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall:
(A) if the offense involves possession of an amount equal to or less
than a benchmark personal use supply, shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title;
(B) if the offense involves possession of less than nine grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, shall be
imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both;
or
(B)(C) if the offense involves possession of nine or more grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
* * *
Sec. 13. 18 V.S.A. § 4235 is amended to read:
§ 4235. HALLUCINOGENIC DRUGS
(a) “Dose” of a hallucinogenic drug means that minimum amount of a
hallucinogenic drug, not commonly used for therapeutic purposes, that causes
a substantial hallucinogenic effect. The Department of Health shall adopt rules
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 28 of 40
that establish doses for hallucinogenic drugs. The Department may
incorporate, where applicable, dosage calculations or schedules, whether
described as “dosage equivalencies” or otherwise, established by the federal
government.
(b) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a
hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned
not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly possessing a hallucinogenic drug, other than
lysergic acid diethylamide, in an amount equal to or less than a benchmark
personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or civil penalty but shall
be provided health needs screening information pursuant to section 4240b of
this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 10 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 100 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 29 of 40
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 1,000 or more doses
of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or
both.
(c) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing a
hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned
not more than three years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing a hallucinogenic drug, other than
lysergic acid diethylamide, in an amount equal to or less than a benchmark
personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or civil penalty but shall
be provided health needs screening information pursuant to section 4240b of
this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling a hallucinogenic
drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned not more than
five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing 10 or more
doses of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 30 of 40
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing 100 or
more doses of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide,
shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than
$500,000.00, or both.
Sec. 14. 18 V.S.A. § 4235a is amended to read:
§ 4235a. ECSTASY
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy shall
be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or
both.
(B) A person knowingly possessing Ecstasy in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 31 of 40
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of 20 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of seven ounces or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1)(A) A Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (1), a person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing Ecstasy shall
be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or
both.
(B) A person knowingly dispensing Ecstasy in an amount equal to or
less than a benchmark personal use supply shall not be subject to a criminal or
civil penalty but shall be provided health needs screening information pursuant
to section 4240b of this title.
(C) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling Ecstasy shall be
imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 32 of 40
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing Ecstasy in
an amount consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing Ecstasy in
an amount consisting of 20 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
Sec. 15. 18 V.S.A. § 4240b is added to read:
§ 4240b. HEALTH NEEDS SCREENING
(a) A person who is in contact with law enforcement or emergency
response personnel and determined to be in possession of or dispensing a
quantity not greater than the benchmark personal use supply of a regulated
drug shall be offered a comprehensive health needs screening from the VT
Helplink Alcohol and Drug Support Center and provided contact information
for locally available harm reduction service providers. A person who
completes the screening shall be eligible to receive a gift card with a retail
value of $50.00.
(b) VT Helplink shall develop a standard referral form for screenings. A
law enforcement officer shall provide the referral form to any person
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 33 of 40
possessing or dispensing an amount of a regulated drug not greater than the
benchmark personal use supply of such drug.
(c) Completion or participation in a health screening pursuant to this
section shall not be deemed an admission of any kind by the person
participating in such screening and shall not be admissible as evidence in any
court proceeding.
Sec. 16. 18 V.S.A. § 4240c is added to read:
§ 4240c. SUBSTANCE PREVENTION AND SUPPORT SPECIAL FUNDS
(a) Substance Use Prevention Special Fund.
(1) Creation. There is established the Substance Use Prevention Special
Fund to be administered by the Department of Health in accordance with
32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
(2) Purpose. Appropriations from the Substance Use Prevention Special
Fund shall only be used to fund substance use prevention programming.
(3) Revenue. The Substance Use Prevention Special Fund shall consist
of 30 percent of the revenues raised by the cannabis excise tax imposed by
32 V.S.A. § 7902, not to exceed $10,000,000.00 per fiscal year.
(b) Community Care, Health, and Safety Special Fund.
(1) Creation. There is established the Community Care, Health, and
Safety Special Fund to be administered by the Department of Health in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 34 of 40
(2) Purpose. Appropriations from the Community Care, Health, and
Safety Special Fund shall only be used to provide grants and funding to
organizations and service providers in this State to increase voluntary access to
care for individuals with substance use-related health needs, as set forth in this
subdivision. Grants from the Community Care, Health, and Safety Special
Fund shall be issued by the Department of Health, based on the
recommendations of the Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory Board, on an
annual basis for the following services and any other related services necessary
to meet the needs of all individuals with substance use-related health needs
who voluntarily seek services in any county in the State:
(A) The establishment and operation of a network of community care
resource centers to provide health and harm reduction services. A resource
center may be a new facility or an expansion of an existing facility. A resource
center shall provide, to the extent possible, all of the following:
(i) immediate screening of the acute needs of persons who use
drugs and linkage to appropriate services;
(ii) health needs screenings, as developed in accordance with
section 4240b of this title, that shall be made available in person and through
telephonic and electronic means;
(iii) individual health needs planning that prioritizes the self-
identified needs of the individual and may address the individual’s need and
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 35 of 40
desire for substance use disorder treatment, care for co-occurring health
conditions, housing, employment and training, child care, and other services;
(iv) a drop-in facility that provides a welcoming environment for
individuals who may be intoxicated to receive care, nutrition, hydration,
hygiene services, and clothing;
(v) services and education focusing on reducing the potential harm
of drug use, including overdose prevention education, access to naloxone
hydrochloride and sterile syringes, stimulant-specific drug education and
outreach, and drug checking;
(vi) direct connection to short-term accommodations for
individuals who are awaiting admission to or coordination of higher levels of
care; and
(vii) direct handoffs to and coordinated care with other services.
(B) Intensive case management for individuals with substance use-
related health needs to connect individuals to care as necessary and as desired
by the individual.
(C) Ongoing peer counseling, support, and recovery services for
individuals with substance use-related health needs, as well as peer outreach
workers to engage directly with communities that could potentially benefit
from services.
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 36 of 40
(D) Services and education focusing on reducing the potential harm
of drug use, including overdose prevention education; access to naloxone,
hydrochloride, and sterile syringes; stimulant-specific drug education and
outreach; drug-checking services; and overdose prevention centers.
(E) Low-barrier substance use disorder treatment that does not
require abstinence.
(F) Medications for substance use disorder, including mobile and
remote access to telehealth for consultations and prescribing.
(G) Medically managed withdrawal services.
(H) Recovery community centers.
(I) Non-law-enforcement mobile outreach teams that can engage and
provide services for individuals with substance use-related health and mental
health needs, including crisis services, administration of needs assessments,
and connections with other service providers.
(J) Transportation to any necessary services.
(K) Programs and services for at-risk youth.
(3) Revenue. The Community Care, Health, and Safety Special Fund
shall consist of:
(A) 40 percent of the revenues raised by the cannabis excise tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. § 7902;
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 37 of 40
(B) 15 percent of any monies disbursed to the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund pursuant to section 4774 of this title; and
(C) an amount equal to the total annual reduction in expenditures
projected to result from the elimination of criminal penalties for individuals in
possession of personal use quantities of criminal substances in Vermont as
determined by the Secretary of Administration and transferred from the
General Fund by the General Assembly.
Sec. 17. 18 V.S.A. § 4774 is amended to read:
§ 4774. OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a)(1) There is created the Opioid Abatement Special Fund, a special fund
established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and
administered by the Department of Health. The Opioid Abatement Special
Fund shall consist of all abatement account fund monies disbursed to the
Department from the national abatement account fund, the national opioid
abatement trust, the supplemental opioid abatement fund, or any other
settlement funds that must be utilized exclusively for opioid prevention,
intervention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction services.
* * *
(b) Expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund shall be used
for the following opioid prevention, intervention, treatment, recovery, harm
reduction, and evaluation activities:
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 38 of 40
* * *
(12) implementing other evidence-based or evidence-informed programs
or strategies that support prevention, harm reduction, treatment, or recovery of
opioid use disorder and any co-occurring substance use or mental health
disorder; and
(13) the transfer of 15 percent of any monies disbursed to the Opioid
Abatement Special Fund to the Community Care, Health, and Safety Special
Fund as required pursuant to subdivision 4240c(b)(3)(B) of this title; and
(14) the cost of the administrative, technical, and legal assistance
provided to the Advisory Committee by the Department of Health.
(c) Priority for expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund shall
be aimed at reducing overdose deaths, including the following:
* * *
(8) expanding syringe service programs, specifically providing
comprehensive syringe services programs with more wraparound services,
including linkages to opioid use disorder treatment, access to sterile syringes,
and linkages to care and treatment of infectious diseases; and
(9) facilitating evidence-based or evidence-informed data collection and
research analyzing and evaluating the effectiveness of the abatement strategies
within Vermont; and
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 39 of 40
(10) expenditures from the Community Care, Health, and Safety Special
Fund as authorized under subdivision 4240c(b)(2) of this title.
Sec. 18. 32 V.S.A. § 7909 is amended to read:
§ 7909. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION FUNDING
(a) Thirty percent of the revenues raised by the cannabis excise tax
imposed by section 7902 of this title, not to exceed $10,000,000.00 per fiscal
year, shall be used to fund substance misuse prevention programming in the
subsequent fiscal year.
(b) If any General Fund appropriations for substance misuse prevention
programming remain unexpended at the end of a fiscal year, that balance shall
be carried forward and shall only be used for the purpose of funding substance
misuse prevention programming in the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) Any appropriation balance carried forward pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section shall be in addition to revenues allocated for substance misuse
prevention programming pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. [Repealed.]
Sec. 19. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall report to the General Assembly
regarding the budgetary impacts that are projected to result from the
elimination of criminal penalties for individuals in possession of personal use
quantities of regulated drugs in Vermont not later than January 15, 2026. The
report shall analyze any budgetary impacts such as reductions in expenditures
VT LEG #380148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.189
2025 Page 40 of 40
throughout the criminal justice system and, notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20,
shall be updated by the Secretary of Administration as necessary.
(b) The 30 percent of the unexpended and unobligated balance of the
Cannabis Regulation Fund that is transferred to the General Fund pursuant to
7 V.S.A. § 845(d)(1) and 32 V.S.A. § 7909 that is not expended by
December 31, 2025 and any other revenue from the cannabis excise tax that is
appropriated for substance use prevention programming pursuant to 32 V.S.A.
§ 7909 that is not expended by December 31, 2025 shall be transferred to the
Substance Use Prevention Special Fund not later than April 1, 2026.
Sec. 20. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 (findings), 2 (definitions), 3 (Department of
Health), 4 (Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory Board), and 19
(implementation) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 5–18 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380148 v.1